Maryland, session 2025, SB0732.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
9–201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0732*

SENATE BILL 732
(k) “Sewage” means:
(1) Any human or animal excretion or water–carried domestic waste; or
(2) A mixture of industrial waste and any of the things in item (1) of this
subsection.
(l) “Sewage sludge” means any thickened liquid, suspension, settled solid, or
dried residue that a sewage treatment plant extracts from sewage.
(n) “Sewage sludge utilization permit” means a permit, issued by the Department,
to utilize sewage sludge.
(t) “Utilize sewage sludge” means to collect, handle, burn, store, treat, or
transport sewage sludge to or from a sewage sludge generator or utilizer in this State, to
apply it to land, or to dispose of it.
9–231.
(a) A person shall have a sewage sludge utilization permit before the person
utilizes sewage sludge in this State.
(b) A person shall have a separate sewage sludge utilization permit for each site
where the person utilizes sewage sludge.
9–231.1.
(A) A SEWAGE SLUDGE UTILIZATION PERMIT ISSUED OR RENEWED BY THE
DEPARTMENT FOR THE APPLICATION OF SEWAGE SLUDGE TO AGRICULTURAL LAND
SHALL LIMIT THE TOTAL CONCENTRATION OF PERFLUOROOCTANE SULFONIC ACID
(PFOS) OR PERFLUOROOCTANOIC ACID (PFOA) TO THE LESSER OF:
(1) 1 MICROGRAM PER KILOGRAM;
(2) THE LEVEL ESTABLISHED IN HEALTH–BASED STANDARDS
ADOPTED BY THE U.S. ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY; OR
(3) THE LEVEL ESTABLISHED IN REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE
DEPARTMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(B) (1) COMPLIANCE WITH THE LIMITS ESTABLISHED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE DEMONSTRATED BY AN ANALYSIS OF A
SAMPLE OF THE ENTIRE QUANTITY OF SEWAGE SLUDGE TO BE LAND APPLIED,
PERFORMED:

SENATE BILL 732 3
(I) BY AN INDEPENDENT LABORATORY OR OTHER
LABORATORY ACCEPTABLE TO THE DEPARTMENT;
(II) USING STANDARDS, PROCEDURES, AND METHODS THAT
ARE ACCEPTABLE TO THE DEPARTMENT; AND
(III) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, NOT MORE THAN 14 DAYS BEFORE THE DATE OF THE LAND
APPLICATION.
(2) A SAMPLE MAY BE ANALYZED MORE THAN 14 DAYS BEFORE THE
DATE OF LAND APPLICATION IF THE SEWAGE SLUDGE IS:
(I) HAULED DIRECTLY FROM THE SEWAGE SLUDGE
GENERATOR TO THE FIELD; AND
(II) NOT STORED OFF–SITE OR MIXED WITH ANY OTHER
MATERIAL PRIOR TO LAND APPLICATION.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO ESTABLISH:
(1) FOR PFOS AND PFOA, CONCENTRATION LIMITS THAT ARE MORE
STRINGENT THAN THE LIMITS SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (A)(1) AND (2) OF THIS
SECTION; AND
(2) CONCENTRATION LIMITS FOR PER– AND POLYFLUOROALKYL
SUBSTANCES OR OTHER SUBSTANCES THAT ARE NOT LISTED IN SUBSECTION (A) OF
THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.